voikko-fi/vvfst/lukusanat.lexc
LEXICON Erikoisluku
[Lu][Xp]kolmi[X]kolmi:kolmi	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]neli[X]neli:neli	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]seitsen[X]seitsen:seitsen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]kymmen[X]kymmen:kymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]kaksikymmen[X]kaksi[Bm]kymmen:kaksikymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]kolmikymmen[X]kolmi[Bm]kymmen:kolmikymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]nelikymmen[X]neli[Bm]kymmen:nelikymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]viisikymmen[X]viisi[Bm]kymmen:viisikymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]kuusikymmen[X]kuusi[Bm]kymmen:kuusikymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]seitsenkymmen[X]seitsen[Bm]kymmen:seitsenkymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]kahdeksankymmen[X]kahdeksan[Bm]kymmen:kahdeksankymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdeksänkymmen[X]yhdeksän[Bm]kymmen:yhdeksänkymmen	LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmen[X]pari[Bm]kymmen:parikymmen	                LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pari[Bm]kymmentä:parikymmentä            Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parin[Bm]kymmenen:parinkymmenen          Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]paria[Bm]kymmentä:pariakymmentä          Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parina[Bm]kymmenenä:parinakymmenenä      Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pariksi[Bm]kymmeneksi:pariksikymmeneksi  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parissa[Bm]kymmenessä:parissakymmenessä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parista[Bm]kymmenestä:paristakymmenestä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pariin[Bm]kymmeneen:pariinkymmeneen      Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parilta[Bm]kymmeneltä:pariltakymmeneltä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parilla[Bm]kymmenellä:parillakymmenellä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parille[Bm]kymmenelle:parillekymmenelle  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]paritta[Bm]kymmenettä:parittakymmenettä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parine[Bm]kymmenine:parinekymmenine      OlV_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parin[Bm]kymmenin:parinkymmenin          Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parit[Bm]kymmenet:paritkymmenet            Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parien[Bm]kymmenien:parienkymmenien        Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parien[Bm]kymmenten:parienkymmenten        Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareja[Bm]kymmeniä:parejakymmeniä          Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareina[Bm]kymmeninä:pareinakymmeninä      Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareiksi[Bm]kymmeniksi:pareiksikymmeniksi  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareissa[Bm]kymmenissä:pareissakymmenissä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareista[Bm]kymmenistä:pareistakymmenistä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareihin[Bm]kymmeniin:pareihinkymmeniin    Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareilta[Bm]kymmeniltä:pareiltakymmeniltä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareilla[Bm]kymmenillä:pareillakymmenillä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareille[Bm]kymmenille:pareillekymmenille  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareitta[Bm]kymmenittä:pareittakymmenittä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pareine[Bm]kymmenine:pareinekymmenine      OlV_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parein[Bm]kymmenin:pareinkymmenin          Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parin[Bm]kymmenien:parinkymmenien        Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parina[Bm]kymmeninä:parinakymmeninä      Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pariksi[Bm]kymmeniksi:pariksikymmeniksi  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parissa[Bm]kymmenissä:parissakymmenissä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parista[Bm]kymmenistä:paristakymmenistä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]pariin[Bm]kymmeniin:pariinkymmeniin      Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parilta[Bm]kymmeniltä:pariltakymmeniltä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parilla[Bm]kymmenillä:parillakymmenillä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]parille[Bm]kymmenille:parillekymmenille  Liitesana_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]parikymmentä[X]paritta[Bm]kymmenittä:parittakymmenittä  Liitesana_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sn][Ny]pari[Bm]tuhatta:parituhatta	NimisanaNormaaliYsJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sn][Ny]parin[Bm]tuhante:parintuhante	Omistusliite_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sg][Ny]parin[Bm]tuhannen:parintuhannen	NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sp][Ny]paria[Bm]tuhatta:pariatuhatta	NimisanaLiOlAA_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Ses][Ny]parina[Bm]tuhantena:parinatuhantena	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Str][Ny]pariksi[Bm]tuhanneksi:pariksituhanneksi	NimisanaLiOlI_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sine][Ny]parissa[Bm]tuhannessa:parissatuhannessa	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sela][Ny]parista[Bm]tuhannesta:paristatuhannesta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sill][Ny]pariin[Bm]tuhantee:pariintuhantee	NimisanaLiOlN_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sade][Ny]parilla[Bm]tuhannella:parillatuhannella	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sabl][Ny]parilta[Bm]tuhannelta:pariltatuhannelta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sall][Ny]parille[Bm]tuhannelle:parilletuhannelle	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Ln][Xp]parituhatta[X][Sab][Ny]paritta[Bm]tuhannetta:parittatuhannetta	NimisanaLiOlV_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puoli[Bm]toista:puolitoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolen[Bm]toista:puolentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolta[Bm]toista:puoltatoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolena[Bm]toista:puolenatoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puoleksi[Bm]toista:puoleksitoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolessa[Bm]toista:puolessatoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolesta[Bm]toista:puolestatoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puoleen[Bm]toista:puoleentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolelta[Bm]toista:puoleltatoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolella[Bm]toista:puolellatoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolelle[Bm]toista:puolelletoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puoletta[Bm]toista:puolettatoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolitoista[X]puolisen[Bm]toista:puolisentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]kolmisentoista[X]kolmisen[Bm]toista:kolmisentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]nelisentoista[X]nelisen[Bm]toista:nelisentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]viitisentoista[X]viitisen[Bm]toista:viitisentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]kuutisentoista[X]kuutisen[Bm]toista:kuutisentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]seitsemisentoista[X]seitsemisen[Bm]toista:seitsemisentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]kahdeksisentoista[X]kahdeksisen[Bm]toista:kahdeksisentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdeksisentoista[X]yhdeksisen[Bm]toista:yhdeksisentoista	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolisensataa[X]puolisen[Bm]sataa:puolisensataa	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]puolisentoistasataa[X]puolisen[Bm]toista[Bm]sataa:puolisentoistasataa	Liitesana_a	;
[Lu][Xp]parisen[X]parisen:parisen	ParisenKymmentä	;
[Lu][Xp]kolmisen[X]kolmisen:kolmisen	XKymmentä_a	;
[Lu][Xp]nelisen[X]nelisen:nelisen	XKymmentä_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]viitisen[X]viitisen:viitisen	XKymmentä_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kuutisen[X]kuutisen:kuutisen	XKymmentä_a	;
[Lu][Xp]seitsemisen[X]seitsemisen:seitsemisen	XKymmentä_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kahdeksisen[X]kahdeksisen:kahdeksisen	XKymmentä_a	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdeksisen[X]yhdeksisen:yhdeksisen	XKymmentä_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kymmenisen[X]kymmenisen:kymmenisen	Liitesana_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]toista[X]toista:toista	XKymmentäEiLiitesana	;
[Lu][Xp]kolmatta[X]kolmatta:kolmatta	XKymmentäEiLiitesana	;
[Lu][Xp]neljättä[X]neljättä:neljättä	XKymmentäEiLiitesana	;
[Lu][Xp]viidettä[X]viidettä:viidettä	XKymmentäEiLiitesana	;
[Lu][Xp]kuudetta[X]kuudetta:kuudetta	XKymmentäEiLiitesana	;
[Lu][Xp]seitsemättä[X]seitsemättä:seitsemättä	XKymmentäEiLiitesana	;
[Lu][Xp]kahdeksatta[X]kahdeksatta:kahdeksatta	XKymmentäEiLiitesana	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdeksättä[X]yhdeksättä:yhdeksättä	XKymmentäEiLiitesana	;

LEXICON ParisenKymmentä
[Bc][Sn][Ny][Xp]kymmentä[X]kymmentä:kymmentä	Loppu	;
[Bc][Sn][Ny][Xp]sataa[X]sataa:sataa	Loppu	;

LEXICON XKymmentäEiLiitesana
[Bc][Lu][Sn][Ny][Xp]kymmentä[X]kymmentä:kymmentä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Bc][Lu][Sn][Ny][Xp]sataa[X]sataa:sataa	Liitesana_a	;
[Bc][Lu][Sn][Ny][Xp]tuhatta[X]tuhatta:tuhatta	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON LukusanaKymmentäSnNy
[Bc]kymmentä:kymmentä	LukusanaLiitesana_ä	;
[Bc]sataa:sataa	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
LukusanaKerroinTuhatta	;

LEXICON LukusanaKerroinTuhatta
[Bc]tuhatta:tuhatta	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Bc]miljoonaa:miljoonaa	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Bc]miljardia:miljardia	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Bc]triljoonaa:triljoonaa	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Bc]kvadriljoonaa:kvadriljoonaa	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Bc]kvintiljoonaa:kvintiljoonaa	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Bc]sekstiljoonaa:sekstiljoonaa	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Bc]septiljoonaa:septiljoonaa	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;
[Bc]sentiljoonaa:sentiljoonaa	LukusanaLiitesana_a	;

LEXICON NumeromerkinAlku
[Lu]:	Numeromerkki	;
[Lu]:	PvmIpAlku	;

LEXICON PvmIpAlku
%0:%0	PvmIpJatko	;
1:1	PvmIpJatko	;
2:2	PvmIpJatko	;
3:3	PvmIpJatko	;
4:4	PvmIpJatko	;
5:5	PvmIpJatko	;
6:6	PvmIpJatko	;
7:7	PvmIpJatko	;
8:8	PvmIpJatko	;
9:9	PvmIpJatko	;

LEXICON PvmIpJatko
PvmIpAlku	;
.:.	PvmIpAlku2	;

LEXICON PvmIpAlku2
%0:%0	PvmIpJatko2	;
1:1	PvmIpJatko2	;
2:2	PvmIpJatko2	;
3:3	PvmIpJatko2	;
4:4	PvmIpJatko2	;
5:5	PvmIpJatko2	;
6:6	PvmIpJatko2	;
7:7	PvmIpJatko2	;
8:8	PvmIpJatko2	;
9:9	PvmIpJatko2	;

LEXICON PvmIpJatko2
PvmIpAlku2	;
.:.	PvmIpAlku3	;
.:.	Loppu	;

LEXICON PvmIpAlku3
%0:%0	PvmIpJatko3	;
1:1	PvmIpJatko3	;
2:2	PvmIpJatko3	;
3:3	PvmIpJatko3	;
4:4	PvmIpJatko3	;
5:5	PvmIpJatko3	;
6:6	PvmIpJatko3	;
7:7	PvmIpJatko3	;
8:8	PvmIpJatko3	;
9:9	PvmIpJatko3	;

LEXICON PvmIpJatko3
PvmIpAlku3	;
.:.	PvmIpAlku3	;
Loppu	;

LEXICON Numeromerkki
%0:%0	NumeromerkinJatko	;
1:1	NumeromerkinJatko	;
2:2	NumeromerkinJatko	;
3:3	NumeromerkinJatko	;
4:4	NumeromerkinJatko	;
5:5	NumeromerkinJatko	;
6:6	NumeromerkinJatko	;
7:7	NumeromerkinJatko	;
8:8	NumeromerkinJatko	;
9:9	NumeromerkinJatko	;

LEXICON NumeromerkkiPilkunJälkeen
%0:%0	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
1:1	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
2:2	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
3:3	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
4:4	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
5:5	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
6:6	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
7:7	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
8:8	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;
9:9	NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen	;

LEXICON NumeromerkinJatko
Numeromerkki	;
%::%:	Numeromerkki	;
,:,	NumeromerkkiPilkunJälkeen	;
YhdysmerkkiJaLukusananJälkiliite	;
-:-	LukusananJälkiliiteJl	;
LyhenteenTaivutuspääte_aä	;
.:.	Loppu	;
Loppu	;

LEXICON NumeromerkinJatkoPilkunJälkeen
NumeromerkkiPilkunJälkeen	;
YhdysmerkkiJaLukusananJälkiliite	;
Lyhenne_aä	;
Loppu	;

LEXICON LukusanaToista
[Bc]toista[Xp][X]:toista	Liitesana_a	;
[Bc]toista:toista	LukusananJälkiliite	;
[Bc]toista:toista	LukusanaKerroinTuhatta	;
[Bc]toista:toista	LukusananAlkuKerroin	;

LEXICON JärjestyslukuToista
[Bc]toista[Xp][X]:toista	Liitesana_a	;
[Bc]toista:toista	LukusananJälkiliiteJl	;

LEXICON YhdysmerkkiJaLukusananJälkiliite
-:-	LukusananJälkiliiteEiYhdysmerkkiä	;
-[Bc]:-	Loppu;

LEXICON LukusananJälkiliite
LukusananJälkiliiteEiYhdysmerkkiä	;
LukusanaYsJatko	;
-[Bc]:-	Loppu;

LEXICON LukusananJälkiliiteEiYhdysmerkkiä
[Bc][Bh]@P.YS_EI_GENETIIVIALKUA.ON@@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@@P.YS_JATKETTAVA.ON@:@P.YS_EI_GENETIIVIALKUA.ON@@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@@P.YS_JATKETTAVA.ON@	Sanasto_n	;
LukusananErikoisjälkiliite	;

LEXICON LukusananErikoisjälkiliite
[Bc][Ll][Xp]karkeinen[X]karkei:karkei	LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a	;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]kiloinen[X]kiloi:kiloi	LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a	;
[Bc][Ln][Xp]kulmio[X]kulmio:kulmio	LukusananJälkiliiteAutio_a	;
[Bc][Ln][Xp]luku[X]lu:lu	LukusananJälkiliiteLuku_a	; ! "kahdeksankymmentäluku"
[Bc][Ll][Xp]tekijäinen[X]tekijäi:tekijäi	LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_ä	;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]vuotias[X]vuotia:vuotia	LukusananJälkiliiteVieras_a	;

LEXICON LukusananJälkiliiteJl
[Bc][Ll][Xp]luokkalainen[X]luokkalai:luokkalai	LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a	;
[Bc][Ln][Xp]osa[X]os@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@:os@P.YS_EI_JATKOA.ON@	LukusananJälkiliiteKoira_a	;
LukusananJälkiliite	;
